Maine, session 132, LD975.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §152, sub-§8, as amended by PL 1999, c. 547, Pt. B, §5 and
affected by §80, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 14 MRSA §9002, sub-§9, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 648, Pt. A, §1, is
amended to read:
9. Reproductive health care services. "Reproductive health care services" means all
supplies, care and services of a medical, behavioral health, mental health, surgical,
psychiatric, therapeutic, diagnostic, preventive, rehabilitative or supportive nature,
including medication, relating to pregnancy, contraception, assisted reproduction, or
pregnancy loss management or the termination of a pregnancy in accordance with the
applicable standard of care as defined by major medical professional organizations and
agencies with expertise in the field of reproductive health care.
Sec. 3. 15 MRSA §321, sub-§2, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 405, Pt. A, §32,
is further amended to read:
A. A person is charged with or convicted of a violation of Title 17‑A, section 201,
202, 203, 204, 207, 207‑A, 208, 208‑A, 208‑B, 208‑C, 208‑D, 208‑E, 208‑F, 209,
209‑A, 210, 210‑A, 210‑B, 210‑C, 211, 253, 301, 302, 303, 506‑A or 556;
Sec. 4. 17-A MRSA §2, sub-§14-B is enacted to read:
14-B. Human being. "Human being" includes a human being beginning at the
moment of conception.
Sec. 5. 17-A MRSA §2, sub-§20, as enacted by PL 1975, c. 499, §1, is amended
to read:
20. Person. "Person," "another person" or "another," when "another" is used in
reference to a person, means a human being or an organization.
Sec. 6. 17-A MRSA §207-A, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §3, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) Has one or more prior convictions for violating paragraph A or for violating
section 208‑D, 208‑E, 208‑F, 209‑A, 210‑B, 210‑C or 211‑A or one or more prior
convictions for engaging in conduct substantially similar to that contained in
paragraph A or in section 208‑D, 208‑E, 208‑F, 209‑A, 210‑B, 210‑C or 211‑A in
another jurisdiction;
Sec. 7. 17-A MRSA §207-A, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §3, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) Has one or more prior convictions for violating section 208, or 208‑B or 208‑C,
and the State had pled and proved that the victim of the applicable prior conviction
was a family or household member, as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102,
subsection 6, or a dating partner, as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102, subsection
4, or has one or more prior convictions in another jurisdiction for engaging in
conduct substantially similar to that contained in section 208, or 208‑B or 208‑C
and it had been pled and proved that the victim was a family or household member
or a dating partner.
Page 1 - 132LR0637(01)

Sec. 8. 17-A MRSA §208-C, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 408, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 9. 17-A MRSA §208-F, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §6, is repealed.
Sec. 10. 17-A MRSA §209-A, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §8, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) Has one or more prior convictions for violating paragraph A or for violating
section 207‑A, 208‑D, 208‑E, 208‑F, 210‑B, 210‑C or 211‑A or one or more prior
convictions for engaging in conduct substantially similar to that contained in
paragraph A or in section 207‑A, 208‑D, 208‑E, 208‑F, 210‑B, 210‑C or 211‑A in
another jurisdiction;
Sec. 11. 17-A MRSA §209-A, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §8, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) Has one or more prior convictions for violating section 208, or 208‑B or 208‑C,
and the State had pled and proved that the victim of the applicable prior conviction
was a family or household member, as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102,
subsection 6, or a dating partner, as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102, subsection
4, or has one or more prior convictions in another jurisdiction for engaging in
conduct substantially similar to that contained in section 208, or 208‑B or 208‑C
and it had been pled and proved that the victim was a family or household member
or a dating partner.
Sec. 12. 17-A MRSA §210-B, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §10,
is further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) Has one or more prior convictions for violating paragraph A or for violating
section 207‑A, 208‑D, 208‑E, 208‑F, 209‑A, 210‑C or 211‑A or one or more prior
convictions for engaging in conduct substantially similar to that contained in
paragraph A or in section 207‑A, 208‑D, 208‑E, 208‑F, 209‑A, 210‑C or 211‑A in
another jurisdiction;
Sec. 13. 17-A MRSA §210-B, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §10,
is further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) Has one or more prior convictions for violating section 208, or 208‑B or 208‑C,
and the State had pled and proved that the victim of the applicable prior conviction
was a family or household member, as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102,
subsection 6, or a dating partner, as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102, subsection
4, or has one or more prior convictions in another jurisdiction for engaging in
conduct substantially similar to that contained in section 208, or 208‑B or 208‑C
and it had been pled and proved that the victim was a family or household member
or a dating partner.
Sec. 14. 17-A MRSA §210-C, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §12,
is further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) Has one or more prior convictions for violating paragraph A or for violating
section 207‑A, 208‑D, 208‑E, 208‑F, 209‑A, 210‑B or 211‑A or one or more prior
convictions for engaging in conduct substantially similar to that contained in
paragraph A or in section 207‑A, 208‑D, 208‑E, 208‑F, 209‑A, 210‑B or 211‑A in
another jurisdiction;
Page 2 - 132LR0637(01)

Sec. 15. 17-A MRSA §210-C, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §12,
is further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) Has one or more prior convictions for violating section 208, or 208‑B or 208‑C,
and the State had pled and proved that the victim of the applicable prior conviction
was a family or household member, as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102,
subsection 6, or a dating partner, as defined in Title 19-A, section 4102, subsection
4, or has one or more prior convictions in another jurisdiction for engaging in
conduct substantially similar to that contained in section 208, or 208‑B or 208‑C
and it had been pled and proved that the victim was a family or household member
or a dating partner.
Sec. 16. 17-A MRSA §211-A, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §14,
is further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) Has one or more prior convictions for violating paragraph A or for violating
section 207‑A, 208‑D, 208‑E, 208‑F, 209‑A, 210‑B or 210‑C or one or more prior
convictions for engaging in conduct substantially similar to that contained in
paragraph A or in section 207‑A, 208‑D, 208‑E, 208‑F, 209‑A, 210‑B or 210‑C in
another jurisdiction;
Sec. 17. 17-A MRSA §211-A, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §14,
is further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) Has one or more prior convictions for violating section 208, or 208‑B or 208‑C,
and the State had pled and proved that the victim of the applicable prior conviction
was a family or household member, as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102,
subsection 6, or a dating partner, as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102, subsection
4, or has one or more prior convictions in another jurisdiction for engaging in
conduct substantially similar to that contained in section 208, or 208‑B or 208‑C
and it had been pled and proved that the victim was a family or household member
or a dating partner.
Sec. 18. 19-A MRSA §4114, sub-§5, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 647, Pt. A,
§3 and affected by Pt. B, §65, is amended to read:
C. There has been a violation of Title 17‑A, section 208‑D, or 208‑E or 208‑F.
Sec. 19. 22 MRSA §261, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2017, c. 203, §1, is further
amended to read:
6. Limitations. The panel coordinator may not proceed with voluntary interviews
without the permission of the family. The panel coordinator may not photocopy or retain
copies of medical records or review cases of abortion. In performing work under this
section, the panel coordinator shall minimize the burden imposed on health care
practitioners, hospitals and facilities.
Sec. 20. 22 MRSA §335, sub-§1, ¶G, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 343, §4, is
amended to read:
G. In the case of a project requiring a certificate of need pursuant to section 329,
subsection 1 or section 329, subsection 4‑A, paragraph B, will not cause a reduction in
access to, geographic proximity of, timeliness of or quality of any family planning
services, as defined in section 1902, subsection 4, or any abortion services, except that
Page 3 - 132LR0637(01)

414 the commissioner may approve a project that will cause such a reduction if the
425 commissioner finds:
(1) That the project is economically and financially feasible only if an obstetrical
care service is closed or reduced in capacity; and
(2) After considering all reasonable alternatives, that access to other health care
services will be substantially reduced if the project is not approved.
Sec. 21. 22 MRSA §336, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2023, c. 343, §6, is further
amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
The commissioner may not find that a project primarily involves day-to-day operation of
the facility in its current form if the commissioner finds that the project would result in a
reduction of access to, geographic proximity of, timeliness of or quality of any family
planning services, as defined in section 1902, subsection 4, or any abortion services unless
the commissioner determines that the exceptions described in section 335, subsection 1,
paragraph G are met.
Sec. 22. 22 MRSA c. 263-B, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. 23. 22 MRSA §1902, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2019, c. 236, §3, is further
amended to read:
4. Family planning services. "Family planning services" means medically safe and
effective sexual and reproductive health care and education that enable persons to freely
plan their children, avoid unintended pregnancy and maintain reproductive and sexual
health through the provision of contraceptive supplies, contraceptive procedures and
related counseling; the prevention and treatment of infertility; appropriate prenatal and
obstetric care; the prevention or treatment of sexually transmitted infections; and other
services necessary for reproductive and sexual health. "Family planning services" does not
include health care and education relating to abortion.
Sec. 24. 22 MRSA §2841, as amended by PL 2013, c. 14, §§1 and 2, is further
amended by amending the section headnote to read:
§2841. Registration of fetal deaths; miscarriage
Sec. 25. 22 MRSA §2841, first ¶, as amended by PL 2013, c. 14, §1, is further
amended to read:
Except as authorized by the department or as required under section 1596 provided in
subsection 5, a certificate of each death of a fetus of 20 or more weeks of gestation that
occurs in this State must be filed with the State Registrar of Vital Statistics or the clerk of
the municipality where the delivery occurred within 14 days after delivery and prior to
removal of the fetus from the State.
Sec. 26. 22 MRSA §2841, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Miscarriage reports. A report of each miscarriage must be made by the health care
professional in attendance at or after the occurrence of the miscarriage to the department
on forms prescribed by the department. These report forms must contain all of the
applicable information required on the certificate of fetal death in current use. The report
form must be prepared and signed by the health care professional in attendance at or after
the occurrence of the miscarriage and transmitted to the department not later than 10 days
Page 4 - 132LR0637(01)

413 following the end of the month in which the miscarriage occurs. The identity of any patient
424 or of any health care professional reporting pursuant to this subsection is confidential, and
435 the department shall take the steps necessary to ensure the confidentiality of the identity of
446 any patients or of any health care professionals reporting pursuant to this subsection.
Sec. 27. 22 MRSA §2841-A, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Abortion. "Abortion" means the intentional interruption of a pregnancy by the
application of external agents, whether chemical or physical, or the ingestion of chemical
agents with an intention other than to produce a live birth or to remove a dead fetus,
regardless of the length of gestation.
Sec. 28. 22 MRSA §2841-A, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Miscarriage. "Miscarriage" means an interruption of a pregnancy other than by
abortion of a fetus of less than 20 weeks gestation.
Sec. 29. 22 MRSA §3196, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 274, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 30. 22 MRSA §8705-A, sub-§2, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 659, §2, is
amended to read:
C. Intentionally or knowingly and without authorization using or disseminating health
care information that directly or indirectly identifies patients or health care
practitioners performing abortions as defined in section 1596 in miscarriage reports
pursuant to section 2841, subsection 5.
Sec. 31. 22 MRSA §8707, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2001, c. 457, §14, is further
amended to read:
1. Public access; confidentiality. The board shall adopt rules making available to
any person, upon request, information, except privileged medical information and
confidential information, provided to the organization under this chapter as long as
individual patients are not directly or indirectly identified through a reidentification
process. The board shall adopt rules to protect the identity of certain health care
practitioners, as it determines appropriate, except that the identity of practitioners
performing abortions as defined in section 1596 must be designated as confidential and
must be protected. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are major substantive rules
as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter II‑A 2-A.
Sec. 32. 22 MRSA §8714, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 528, §10 and affected
by §12, is amended to read:
4. Certain practitioners. The board shall adopt rules to protect the identity of certain
health care practitioners, as it determines appropriate, except that the identity of
practitioners performing abortions as defined in section 1596 must be designated as
confidential and may not be disclosed.
Sec. 33. 24 MRSA §2317-B, sub-§21, as repealed and replaced by PL 2019, c.
605, §2, is amended to read:
21. Title 24-A, sections 2765-A and 2847-U. The practice of dental therapy by a
dental therapist, Title 24‑A, sections 2765‑A and 2847‑U; and
Page 5 - 132LR0637(01)

Sec. 34. 24 MRSA §2317-B, sub-§22, as amended by PL 2019, c. 605, §3, is
repealed.
Sec. 35. 24-A MRSA §4320-M, as amended by PL 2023, c. 347, §§1 and 2, is
repealed.
Sec. 36. 32 MRSA §96, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 15, §4, is amended to
read:
For the purpose of monitoring and improving the provision of emergency medical
services and health outcomes within the State, the board may request and collect health
care information or records, including information or records that identify or permit
identification of any patient, concerning individuals who have received emergency medical
treatment within the State, except for any information or records identifying a patient, in
any format, that include HIV or AIDS status or test results, that relate to abortion,
miscarriage, domestic violence or sexual assault or that relate to referral, treatment or
services for a behavioral or mental health disorder or substance use disorder.